California, session 20252026, SB224.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Article 2.2 (commencing with Section 240) is added to Chapter 2.5 of Division 1 of the Water Code, to read: Article 2.2. Water Supply Forecasting240. (a) (1) On or before January 1, 2027, the department shall update its water supply forecasting models and procedures to address the effects of climate change. The department shall prepare and submit a report to the Legislature on its progress in implementing the new forecasting model on or before January 1, 2028, and annually thereafter, and post the report on the department’s internet website.(2) The department shall establish, and publish on the department’s internet website, the specific criteria that it will employ to determine when its updated water supply forecasting model has demonstrated sufficient predictive capability to be ready for use in each of the watersheds.(b) (1) The requirement for submitting a report imposed under subdivision (a) is inoperative on January 1, 2032, pursuant to Section 10231.5 of the Government Code.(2) A report to be submitted pursuant to subdivision (a) shall be submitted in compliance with Section 9795 of the Government Code.241. (a) On or before January 1, 2027, the department shall implement a formal policy and procedures for documenting the department’s operational plans and the department’s rationale for its operating procedures, including the department’s rationale for water releases from reservoirs.(b) (1) On or before January 1, 2028, and annually thereafter, the department shall prepare and submit a report to the Legislature explaining the rationale for its operating procedures specific to the previous water year.(2) The requirement for submitting a report imposed under paragraph (1) is inoperative on January 1, 2032, pursuant to Section 10231.5 of the Government Code. (3) A report to be submitted pursuant to paragraph (1) shall be submitted in compliance with Section 9795 of the Government Code.